Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska21-190
Professional service; limitation.

(1) A limited liability
company which renders a professional service shall render only one type of
professional service and such services as may be ancillary thereto and shall
not render any other type of professional service or engage in any other profession.
No limited liability company may render a professional service except through
its members, managers, professional employees, and agents who are duly licensed
or otherwise legally authorized to render such professional service within
this state.

(2) This section shall
not be interpreted to include in the term professional employee, as used in
the Nebraska Uniform Limited Liability Company Act, clerks, secretaries, bookkeepers,
technicians, and other assistants who are not usually and ordinarily considered
by custom and practice to be rendering a professional service to the public
for which a license or other legal authorization is required.

Laws 2010, LB888, § 90.